Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-913
Appeal; procedure.

Any person having an interest in property affected by and who is dissatisfied with any rule, regulation, or order made or issued under sections 57-901 to 57-921 may appeal the rule, regulation, or order, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1959, c. 262, § 13, p. 911;

Laws 1961, c. 280, § 1, p. 818;

Laws 1967, c. 357, § 1, p. 946;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 101.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.